Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-125
Biennial report.

(RULLCA
209) (a) Each odd-numbered year, a limited liability company or a foreign
limited liability company authorized to transact business in this state shall
deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a biennial report that states:

(1) the name of the company;

(2) the street and mailing addresses of the company's designated office
and the name and street and mailing addresses and post office box number,
if any, of its agent for service of process in this state;

(3) the street and mailing addresses of its principal office; and

(4) in the case of a foreign limited liability company, the state or
other jurisdiction under whose law the company is formed and any alternate
name adopted under subsection (a) of section 21-159.

(b) Information in a biennial report under this section must be current
as of the date the report is delivered to the Secretary of State for filing.

(c) The first biennial report under this section must be delivered to
the Secretary of State between January 1 and April 1 of the odd-numbered year
following the calendar year in which a limited liability company was formed
or a foreign limited liability company was authorized to transact business.
A report must be delivered to the Secretary of State between January 1 and
April 1 of each subsequent odd-numbered calendar year.

(d) If a biennial report under this section does not contain the information
required in subsection (a) of this section, the Secretary of State shall promptly
notify the reporting limited liability company or foreign limited liability
company and return the report to it for correction. If the report is corrected
to contain the information required in subsection (a) of this section and
delivered to the Secretary of State within thirty days after the effective
date of the notice, it is timely delivered.

(e) A correction or an
amendment to the biennial report may be delivered to the Secretary of State
for filing at any time.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 25;

Laws 2014, LB774, § 2.